New York, session 2025-2026, S6491.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 44 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 two new subdivisions 8 and 9 to read as follows: 3 8. (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "tariff cost estimate" means 4 an estimate of any increase in the price or prices of electricity and 5 natural gas, or any associated goods and services, resulting directly or 6 indirectly from tariffs imposed by the federal government on the impor- 7 tation of goods, services or materials from countries outside the United 8 States or due to tariffs placed by governments of countries or their 9 political subdivisions outside the United States on the exportation of 10 goods, services or materials to the United States. Such estimate shall 11 include all increases in price attributable to the tariffs. 12 (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, as part of every bill- 13 ing statement, any utility corporation that serves customers in this 14 state shall provide a tariff cost estimate in a clear, conspicuous and 15 easily understandable manner. 16 9. (a) Each electric corporation and gas corporation subject to the 17 jurisdiction of the commission shall include on each customer bill for 18 delivery services an itemized disclosure of the primary cost components 19 comprising the delivery portion of the bill. Such disclosure shall, at a 20 minimum, provide average allocations per customer based on the utility EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10774-07-5 S. 6491--B 2 1 corporation's most recent rate plan approved by the commission, 2 expressed in dollars, for the following categories: 3 (i) executive compensation; 4 (ii) repairs and maintenance; 5 (iii) depreciation of utility assets; 6 (iv) interest on loans and other debt; 7 (v) rents for facilities and equipment; 8 (vi) property taxes paid to local governments, including towns, 9 cities, villages and school districts; 10 (vii) income taxes on earnings; 11 (viii) shareholder return, including dividends and retained earnings; 12 and 13 (ix) payment to the electric or gas corporation's parent company. 14 (b) The commission shall promulgate rules to prescribe the format and 15 method of calculation for such disclosures. The commission may require 16 such disclosures to appear on the bill face or as a supplemental state- 17 ment provided with the bill. 18 (c) Utility corporations shall annually update these allocations to 19 reflect the most recent revenue requirement approved by the commission. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.